Illinois, session 104th, HB1462.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 5Sections 2.11, 2.26, and 2.33 as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 5/2.11)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.11)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-622)8    Sec. 2.11. Before any person may lawfully hunt wild 9turkey, he shall first obtain a "Wild Turkey Hunting Permit" 10in accordance with the prescribed regulations set forth in an 11administrative rule of the Department. The fee for a Resident 12Wild Turkey Hunting Permit shall not exceed $15.13    Upon submitting suitable evidence of legal residence in 14any other state, non-residents shall be charged a fee not to 15exceed $125 for wild turkey hunting permits.16    The Department may by administrative rule allocate and 17issue non-resident Wild Turkey Permits and establish fees for 18such permits.19    It shall be unlawful to take wild turkey except by use of a 20bow and arrow or a shotgun of not larger than 10 nor smaller 21than 20 gauge with shot size not larger than No. 4, and no 22person while attempting to so take wild turkey may have in his 23possession any other gun unless in accordance with the Firearm   HB1462- 2 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1Concealed Carry Act.2    It shall be unlawful to take, or attempt to take wild 3turkey except during the time from 1/2 hour before sunrise to 41/2 hour after sunset or during such lesser period of time as 5may be specified by administrative rule, during those days for 6which an open season is established.7    It shall be unlawful for any person to take, or attempt to 8take, wild turkey by use of dogs, horses, automobiles, 9aircraft or other vehicles, or conveyances, or by the use or 10aid of bait or baiting of any kind. For the purposes of this 11Section, "bait" means any material, whether liquid or solid, 12including food, salt, minerals, and other products, except 13pure water, that can be ingested, placed, or scattered in such 14a manner as to attract or lure wild turkeys. "Baiting" means 15the placement or scattering of bait to attract wild turkeys. 16An area is considered as baited during the presence of and for 1710 consecutive days following the removal of the bait. 18    It is unlawful for any person to take in Illinois or have 19in his possession more than one wild turkey per valid permit.20    For the purposes of calculating acreage under this 21Section, the Department shall, after determining the total 22acreage of the applicable tract or tracts of land, round 23remaining fractional portions of an acre greater than or equal 24to half of an acre up to the next whole acre. 25    For the purposes of taking wild turkey, nothing in this 26Section shall be construed to prevent the manipulation,   HB1462- 3 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1including mowing or cutting, of standing crops as a normal 2agricultural or soil stabilization practice, food plots, or 3normal agricultural practices, including planting, harvesting, 4and maintenance such as cultivating. Such manipulation for the 5purpose of taking wild turkey may be further modified by 6administrative rule. 7(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22.) 8    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-622)9    Sec. 2.11. Before any person may lawfully hunt wild 10turkey, he shall first obtain a "Wild Turkey Hunting Permit" 11in accordance with the prescribed regulations set forth in an 12administrative rule of the Department. The fee for a Resident 13Wild Turkey Hunting Permit shall not exceed $15.14    Upon submitting suitable evidence of legal residence in 15any other state, non-residents shall be charged a fee not to 16exceed $125 for wild turkey hunting permits.17    The Department may by administrative rule allocate and 18issue non-resident Wild Turkey Permits and establish fees for 19such permits.20    It shall be unlawful to take wild turkey except by use of a 21bow and arrow or a shotgun of not larger than 10 gauge nor 22smaller than .410 bore. The Department may by administrative 23rule restrict shot size, material, or density. No person while 24attempting to so take wild turkey may have in his possession 25any other gun unless in accordance with the Firearm Concealed   HB1462- 4 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1Carry Act.2    It shall be unlawful to take, or attempt to take wild 3turkey except during the time from 1/2 hour before sunrise to 41/2 hour after sunset or during such lesser period of time as 5may be specified by administrative rule, during those days for 6which an open season is established.7    It shall be unlawful for any person to take, or attempt to 8take, wild turkey by use of dogs, horses, automobiles, 9aircraft or other vehicles, or conveyances, or by the use or 10aid of bait or baiting of any kind. For the purposes of this 11Section, "bait" means any material, whether liquid or solid, 12including food, salt, minerals, and other products, except 13pure water, that can be ingested, placed, or scattered in such 14a manner as to attract or lure wild turkeys. "Baiting" means 15the placement or scattering of bait to attract wild turkeys. 16An area is considered as baited during the presence of and for 1710 consecutive days following the removal of the bait. 18Tracking wounded wild mammals or wounded wild birds, including 19wounded wild turkey, by use of unmanned aircraft is 20permissible under the conditions stated in paragraph (2) of 21subsection (i) of Section 2.33 of this Act. 22    It is unlawful for any person to take in Illinois or have 23in his possession more than one wild turkey per valid permit.24    For the purposes of calculating acreage under this 25Section, the Department shall, after determining the total 26acreage of the applicable tract or tracts of land, round   HB1462- 5 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1remaining fractional portions of an acre greater than or equal 2to half of an acre up to the next whole acre. 3    For the purposes of taking wild turkey, nothing in this 4Section shall be construed to prevent the manipulation, 5including mowing or cutting, of standing crops as a normal 6agricultural or soil stabilization practice, food plots, or 7normal agricultural practices, including planting, harvesting, 8and maintenance such as cultivating. Such manipulation for the 9purpose of taking wild turkey may be further modified by 10administrative rule. 11(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 103-622, eff. 1-1-25.) 12    (520 ILCS 5/2.26)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.26)13    Sec. 2.26. Deer hunting permits. Any person attempting to 14take deer shall first obtain a "Deer Hunting Permit" issued by 15the Department in accordance with its administrative rules. 16Those rules must provide for the issuance of the following 17types of resident deer archery permits: (i) a combination 18permit, consisting of one either-sex permit and one 19antlerless-only permit, (ii) a single antlerless-only permit, 20and (iii) a single either-sex permit. The fee for a Deer 21Hunting Permit to take deer with either bow and arrow or gun 22shall not exceed $25 for residents of the State. The 23Department may by administrative rule provide for non-resident 24deer hunting permits for which the fee will not exceed $300 in 252005, $350 in 2006, and $400 in 2007 and thereafter except as   HB1462- 6 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1provided below for non-resident landowners and non-resident 2archery hunters. The Department may by administrative rule 3provide for a non-resident archery deer permit consisting of 4not more than 2 harvest tags at a total cost not to exceed $325 5in 2005, $375 in 2006, and $425 in 2007 and thereafter. The 6fees for a youth resident and non-resident archery deer permit 7shall be the same. 8    The Department shall create a pilot program during the 9special 3-day, youth-only deer hunting season to allow for 10youth deer hunting permits that are valid statewide, excluding 11those counties or portions of counties closed to firearm deer 12hunting. The Department shall adopt rules to implement the 13pilot program. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to 14prohibit the Department from issuing Special Hunt Area Permits 15for the youth-only deer hunting season or establishing, 16through administrative rule, additional requirements 17pertaining to the youth-only deer hunting season on 18Department-owned or Department-managed sites, including 19site-specific quotas or drawings. The provisions of this 20paragraph are inoperative on and after January 1, 2023.21    The standards and specifications for use of guns and bow 22and arrow for deer hunting shall be established by 23administrative rule.24    No person may have in his or her possession any firearm not 25authorized by administrative rule for a specific hunting 26season when taking deer unless in accordance with the Firearm   HB1462- 7 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1Concealed Carry Act.2    Persons having a firearm deer hunting permit shall be 3permitted to take deer only during the period from 1/2 hour 4before sunrise to 1/2 hour after sunset, and only during those 5days for which an open season is established for the taking of 6deer by use of shotgun, handgun, rifle, or muzzle loading 7rifle.8    Persons having an archery deer hunting permit shall be 9permitted to take deer only during the period from 1/2 hour 10before sunrise to 1/2 hour after sunset, and only during those 11days for which an open season is established for the taking of 12deer by use of bow and arrow.13    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer by use of 14dogs, horses, automobiles, aircraft, or other vehicles, or by 15the use or aid of bait or baiting of any kind. For the purposes 16of this Section, "bait" means any material, whether liquid or 17solid, including food, salt, minerals, and other products, 18except pure water, that can be ingested, placed, or scattered 19in such a manner as to attract or lure white-tailed deer. 20"Baiting" means the placement or scattering of bait to attract 21deer. An area is considered as baited during the presence of 22and for 10 consecutive days following the removal of bait. 23Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the use of a dog to 24track wounded deer. Any person using a dog for tracking 25wounded deer must maintain physical control of the dog at all 26times by means of a maximum 50-foot 50 foot lead attached to   HB1462- 8 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1the dog's collar or harness. Tracking wounded deer is 2permissible at night, but at no time outside of legal deer 3hunting hours or seasons shall any person handling or 4accompanying a dog being used for tracking wounded deer be in 5possession of any firearm or archery device. Persons tracking 6wounded deer with a dog during the firearm deer seasons shall 7wear blaze orange or solid blaze pink color as required. Dog 8handlers tracking wounded deer with a dog are exempt from 9hunting license and deer permit requirements so long as they 10are accompanied by the licensed deer hunter who wounded the 11deer. Tracking wounded wild birds or wounded wild mammals, 12including wounded deer, by use of unmanned aircraft is 13permissible under the conditions stated in paragraph (2) of 14subsection (i) of Section 2.33 of this Act. 15    It shall be unlawful to possess or transport any wild deer 16which has been injured or killed in any manner upon a public 17highway or public right-of-way of this State unless exempted 18by administrative rule.19    Persons hunting deer must have the gun unloaded and no bow 20and arrow device shall be carried with the arrow in the nocked 21position during hours when deer hunting is unlawful.22    It shall be unlawful for any person, having taken the 23legal limit of deer by gun, to further participate with a gun 24in any deer hunting party.25    It shall be unlawful for any person, having taken the 26legal limit of deer by bow and arrow, to further participate   HB1462- 9 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1with bow and arrow in any deer hunting party.2    The Department may prohibit upland game hunting during the 3gun deer season by administrative rule.4    The Department shall not limit the number of non-resident, 5either-sex archery deer hunting permits to less than 20,000. 6    Any person who violates any of the provisions of this 7Section, including administrative rules, shall be guilty of a 8Class B misdemeanor.9    For the purposes of calculating acreage under this 10Section, the Department shall, after determining the total 11acreage of the applicable tract or tracts of land, round 12remaining fractional portions of an acre greater than or equal 13to half of an acre up to the next whole acre. 14    For the purposes of taking white-tailed deer, nothing in 15this Section shall be construed to prevent the manipulation, 16including mowing or cutting, of standing crops as a normal 17agricultural or soil stabilization practice, food plots, or 18normal agricultural practices, including planting, harvesting, 19and maintenance such as cultivating or the use of products 20designed for scent only and not capable of ingestion, solid or 21liquid, placed or scattered, in such a manner as to attract or 22lure deer. Such manipulation for the purpose of taking 23white-tailed deer may be further modified by administrative 24rule. 25(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-444, eff. 6-1-20; 26102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-932, eff. 1-1-23.)   HB1462- 10 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1    (520 ILCS 5/2.33)2    Sec. 2.33. Prohibitions. 3    (a) It is unlawful to carry or possess any gun in any State 4refuge unless otherwise permitted by administrative rule.5    (b) It is unlawful to use or possess any snare or 6snare-like device, deadfall, net, or pit trap to take any 7species, except that snares not powered by springs or other 8mechanical devices may be used to trap fur-bearing mammals, in 9water sets only, if at least one-half of the snare noose is 10located underwater at all times.11    (c) It is unlawful for any person at any time to take a 12wild mammal protected by this Act from its den by means of any 13mechanical device, spade, or digging device or to use smoke or 14other gases to dislodge or remove such mammal except as 15provided in Section 2.37.16    (d) It is unlawful to use a ferret or any other small 17mammal which is used in the same or similar manner for which 18ferrets are used for the purpose of frightening or driving any 19mammals from their dens or hiding places.20    (e) (Blank).21    (f) It is unlawful to use spears, gigs, hooks, or any like 22device to take any species protected by this Act.23    (g) It is unlawful to use poisons, chemicals, or 24explosives for the purpose of taking any species protected by 25this Act.  HB1462- 11 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1    (h) It is unlawful to hunt adjacent to or near any peat, 2grass, brush, or other inflammable substance when it is 3burning.4    (i) It is unlawful to take, pursue or intentionally harass 5or disturb in any manner any wild birds or mammals by use or 6aid of any vehicle, conveyance, or unmanned aircraft as 7defined by the Illinois Aeronautics Act, except as permitted 8by the Code of Federal Regulations for the taking of 9waterfowl; except that: 10        (1) nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the use 11    of unmanned aircraft in the inspection of a public utility 12    facility, tower, or structure or a mobile service 13    facility, tower, or structure by a public utility, as 14    defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act, or a 15    provider of mobile services as defined in Section 153 of 16    Title 47 of the United States Code; and . 17        (2) nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the use 18    of unmanned aircraft from being used to locate and recover 19    wounded wild birds or wounded wild mammals if the 20    following conditions are met:21            (A) the wild bird or wild mammal is wounded when a 22        properly licensed hunter has struck the animal with a 23        projectile fired from a legal hunting device during 24        the open season;25            (B) any person operating the unmanned aircraft has 26        obtained permission from the public or private   HB1462- 12 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1        landowner, or the landowner's authorized 2        representative, before launching or landing the 3        unmanned aircraft from or on the landowner's property;4            (C) the person operating the unmanned aircraft 5        does not possess or control a firearm, bow, or other 6        implement whereby wildlife could be killed or taken 7        while afield, whether acting singly or as a group of 8        persons while the unmanned aircraft is in flight, 9        except this subparagraph (C) does not apply to a 10        person lawfully carrying a concealed firearm under the 11        Firearm Concealed Carry Act if the concealed firearm 12        is not used to take wildlife; and13            (D) the unmanned aircraft is operated in a manner 14        that does not harass any wildlife.15        An operator of an unmanned aircraft that meets the 16    conditions under this paragraph (2) is exempt from hunting 17    permit requirements if the operator is not the taker of 18    the wounded animal. 19    It is also unlawful to use the lights of any vehicle or 20conveyance, any light connected to any vehicle or conveyance, 21or any other lighting device or mechanism from inside or on a 22vehicle or conveyance in any area where wildlife may be found 23except in accordance with Section 2.37 of this Act; however, 24nothing in this Section shall prohibit the normal use of 25headlamps for the purpose of driving upon a roadway. For 26purposes of this Section, any other lighting device or   HB1462- 13 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1mechanism shall include, but not be limited to, any device 2that uses infrared or other light not visible to the naked eye, 3electronic image intensification, active illumination, thermal 4imaging, or night vision. Striped skunk, opossum, red fox, 5gray fox, raccoon, bobcat, and coyote may be taken during the 6open season by use of a small light which is worn on the body 7or hand-held by a person on foot and not in any vehicle.8    (j) It is unlawful to use any shotgun larger than 10 gauge 9while taking or attempting to take any of the species 10protected by this Act.11    (k) It is unlawful to use or possess in the field any 12shotgun shell loaded with a shot size larger than lead BB or 13steel T (.20 diameter) when taking or attempting to take any 14species of wild game mammals (excluding white-tailed deer), 15wild game birds, migratory waterfowl or migratory game birds 16protected by this Act, except white-tailed deer as provided 17for in Section 2.26 and other species as provided for by 18subsection (l) or administrative rule.19    (l) It is unlawful to take any species of wild game, except 20white-tailed deer and fur-bearing mammals, with a shotgun 21loaded with slugs unless otherwise provided for by 22administrative rule.23    (m) It is unlawful to use any shotgun capable of holding 24more than 3 shells in the magazine or chamber combined, except 25on game breeding and hunting preserve areas licensed under 26Section 3.27 and except as permitted by the Code of Federal   HB1462- 14 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1Regulations for the taking of waterfowl. If the shotgun is 2capable of holding more than 3 shells, it shall, while being 3used on an area other than a game breeding and shooting 4preserve area licensed pursuant to Section 3.27, be fitted 5with a one-piece plug that is irremovable without dismantling 6the shotgun or otherwise altered to render it incapable of 7holding more than 3 shells in the magazine and chamber, 8combined.9    (n) It is unlawful for any person, except persons who 10possess a permit to hunt from a vehicle as provided in this 11Section and persons otherwise permitted by law, to have or 12carry any gun in or on any vehicle, conveyance, or aircraft, 13unless such gun is unloaded and enclosed in a case, except that 14at field trials authorized by Section 2.34 of this Act, 15unloaded guns or guns loaded with blank cartridges only may be 16carried on horseback while not contained in a case, or to have 17or carry any bow or arrow device in or on any vehicle unless 18such bow or arrow device is unstrung or enclosed in a case, or 19otherwise made inoperable unless in accordance with the 20Firearm Concealed Carry Act.21    (o) (Blank).22    (p) It is unlawful to take game birds, migratory game 23birds or migratory waterfowl with a rifle, pistol, revolver, 24or air rifle.25    (q) It is unlawful to fire a rifle, pistol, revolver, or 26air rifle on, over, or into any waters of this State, including   HB1462- 15 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1frozen waters.2    (r) It is unlawful to discharge any gun or bow and arrow 3device along, upon, across, or from any public right-of-way or 4highway in this State.5    (s) It is unlawful to use a silencer or other device to 6muffle or mute the sound of the explosion or report resulting 7from the firing of any gun.8    (t) It is unlawful for any person to take or attempt to 9take any species of wildlife or parts thereof, or allow a dog 10to hunt, within or upon the land of another, or upon waters 11flowing over or standing on the land of another, or to 12knowingly shoot a gun or bow and arrow device at any wildlife 13physically on or flying over the property of another without 14first obtaining permission from the owner or the owner's 15designee. For the purposes of this Section, the owner's 16designee means anyone who the owner designates in a written 17authorization and the authorization must contain (i) the legal 18or common description of property for which such authority is 19given, (ii) the extent that the owner's designee is authorized 20to make decisions regarding who is allowed to take or attempt 21to take any species of wildlife or parts thereof, and (iii) the 22owner's notarized signature. Before enforcing this Section, 23the law enforcement officer must have received notice from the 24owner or the owner's designee of a violation of this Section. 25Statements made to the law enforcement officer regarding this 26notice shall not be rendered inadmissible by the hearsay rule   HB1462- 16 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1when offered for the purpose of showing the required notice.2    (u) It is unlawful for any person to discharge any firearm 3for the purpose of taking any of the species protected by this 4Act, or hunt with gun or dog, or allow a dog to hunt, within 5300 yards of an inhabited dwelling without first obtaining 6permission from the owner or tenant, except that while 7trapping, hunting with bow and arrow, hunting with dog and 8shotgun using shot shells only, or hunting with shotgun using 9shot shells only, or providing outfitting services under a 10waterfowl outfitter permit, or on licensed game breeding and 11hunting preserve areas, as defined in Section 3.27, on 12federally owned and managed lands and on Department owned, 13managed, leased, or controlled lands, a 100 yard restriction 14shall apply.15    (v) It is unlawful for any person to remove fur-bearing 16mammals from, or to move or disturb in any manner, the traps 17owned by another person without written authorization of the 18owner to do so.19    (w) It is unlawful for any owner of a dog to allow his or 20her dog to pursue, harass, or kill deer, except that nothing in 21this Section shall prohibit the tracking of wounded deer with 22a dog in accordance with the provisions of Section 2.26 of this 23Code.24    (x) It is unlawful for any person to wantonly or 25carelessly injure or destroy, in any manner whatsoever, any 26real or personal property on the land of another while engaged   HB1462- 17 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1in hunting or trapping thereon.2    (y) It is unlawful to hunt wild game protected by this Act 3between one-half hour after sunset and one-half hour before 4sunrise, except that hunting hours between one-half hour after 5sunset and one-half hour before sunrise may be established by 6administrative rule for fur-bearing mammals.7    (z) It is unlawful to take any game bird (excluding wild 8turkeys and crippled pheasants not capable of normal flight 9and otherwise irretrievable) protected by this Act when not 10flying. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a person from 11carrying an uncased, unloaded shotgun in a boat, while in 12pursuit of a crippled migratory waterfowl that is incapable of 13normal flight, for the purpose of attempting to reduce the 14migratory waterfowl to possession, provided that the attempt 15is made immediately upon downing the migratory waterfowl and 16is done within 400 yards of the blind from which the migratory 17waterfowl was downed. This exception shall apply only to 18migratory game birds that are not capable of normal flight. 19Migratory waterfowl that are crippled may be taken only with a 20shotgun as regulated by subsection (j) of this Section using 21shotgun shells as regulated in subsection (k) of this Section.22    (aa) It is unlawful to use or possess any device that may 23be used for tree climbing or cutting while hunting fur-bearing 24mammals, excluding coyotes. However, coyotes may not be hunted 25utilizing these devices during open season for deer except by 26properly licensed deer hunters.  HB1462- 18 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1    (bb) It is unlawful for any person, except licensed game 2breeders, pursuant to Section 2.29 to import, carry into, or 3possess alive in this State any species of wildlife taken 4outside of this State, without obtaining permission to do so 5from the Director.6    (cc) It is unlawful for any person to have in his or her 7possession any freshly killed species protected by this Act 8during the season closed for taking.9    (dd) It is unlawful to take any species protected by this 10Act and retain it alive except as provided by administrative 11rule.12    (ee) It is unlawful to possess any rifle while in the field 13during gun deer season except as provided in Sections 2.25 and 142.26 and administrative rules.15    (ff) It is unlawful for any person to take any species 16protected by this Act, except migratory waterfowl, during the 17gun deer hunting season in those counties open to gun deer 18hunting, unless he or she wears, when in the field, a cap and 19upper outer garment of a solid blaze orange color or solid 20blaze pink color, with such articles of clothing displaying a 21minimum of 400 square inches of blaze orange or solid blaze 22pink color material.23    (gg) It is unlawful during the upland game season for any 24person to take upland game with a firearm unless he or she 25wears, while in the field, a cap of solid blaze orange color or 26solid blaze pink color. For purposes of this Act, upland game   HB1462- 19 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1is defined as Bobwhite Quail, Hungarian Partridge, Ring-necked 2Pheasant, Eastern Cottontail, and Swamp Rabbit.3    (hh) It shall be unlawful to kill or cripple any species 4protected by this Act for which there is a bag limit without 5making a reasonable effort to retrieve such species and 6include such in the bag limit. It shall be unlawful for any 7person having control over harvested game mammals, game birds, 8or migratory game birds for which there is a bag limit to 9wantonly waste or destroy the usable meat of the game, except 10this shall not apply to wildlife taken under Sections 2.37 or 113.22 of this Code. For purposes of this subsection, "usable 12meat" means the breast meat of a game bird or migratory game 13bird and the hind ham and front shoulders of a game mammal. It 14shall be unlawful for any person to place, leave, dump, or 15abandon a wildlife carcass or parts of it along or upon a 16public right-of-way or highway or on public or private 17property, including a waterway or stream, without the 18permission of the owner or tenant. It shall not be unlawful to 19discard game meat that is determined to be unfit for human 20consumption.21    (ii) This Section shall apply only to those species 22protected by this Act taken within the State. Any species or 23any parts thereof, legally taken in and transported from other 24states or countries, may be possessed within the State, except 25as provided in this Section and Sections 2.35, 2.36, and 3.21.26    (jj) (Blank).  HB1462- 20 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1    (kk) Nothing contained in this Section shall prohibit the 2Director from issuing permits to paraplegics or to other 3persons with disabilities who meet the requirements set forth 4in administrative rule to shoot or hunt from a vehicle as 5provided by that rule, provided that such is otherwise in 6accord with this Act.7    (ll) Nothing contained in this Act shall prohibit the 8taking of aquatic life protected by the Fish and Aquatic Life 9Code or birds and mammals protected by this Act, except deer 10and fur-bearing mammals, from a boat not camouflaged or 11disguised to alter its identity or to further provide a place 12of concealment and not propelled by sail or mechanical power. 13However, only shotguns not larger than 10 gauge nor smaller 14than .410 bore loaded with not more than 3 shells of a shot 15size no larger than lead BB or steel T (.20 diameter) may be 16used to take species protected by this Act.17    (mm) Nothing contained in this Act shall prohibit the use 18of a shotgun, not larger than 10 gauge nor smaller than a 20 19gauge, with a rifled barrel.20    (nn) It shall be unlawful to possess any species of 21wildlife or wildlife parts taken unlawfully in Illinois, any 22other state, or any other country, whether or not the wildlife 23or wildlife parts are indigenous to Illinois. For the purposes 24of this subsection, the statute of limitations for unlawful 25possession of wildlife or wildlife parts shall not cease until 262 years after the possession has permanently ended.   HB1462- 21 -LRB104 03074 BDA 13092 b1    (oo) It is unlawful while deer hunting:2        (1) to possess or be in close proximity to a rifle that 3    is not centerfire; or4        (2) to be in possession of or in close proximity to a 5    magazine that is capable of making a rifle not a single 6    shot. 7(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-837, eff. 5-13-22; 8102-932, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 9    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 10changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 11that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 12represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 13not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 14made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 15Public Act. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 172025.